OL/spell/bg_BG.aff
FLAG long					
SFX	X1	Y	3		
SFX	X1		а	анъ/L4	.
SFX	X1		мъ	денъ/L4	.
SFX	X1		я	анъ/L4	.
					
SFX	X2	Y	4		
SFX	X2		а	ѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	X2		а	ѣйки	.
SFX	X2		я	ѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	X2		я	ѣйки	.
					
//SFX	XX	Y	0		
					
SFX	Y0	Y	88		
SFX	Y0		жа	жа	.
SFX	Y0		жа	жешъ	.
SFX	Y0		жа	же	.
SFX	Y0		жа	жемъ	.
SFX	Y0		жа	жете	.
SFX	Y0		жа	жатъ	.
SFX	Y0		жа	гахъ	.
SFX	Y0		жа	га	.
SFX	Y0		жа	га	.
SFX	Y0		жа	гохме	.
SFX	Y0		жа	гохте	.
SFX	Y0		жа	гоха	.
SFX	Y0		жа	жехъ	.
SFX	Y0		жа	жеше	.
SFX	Y0		жа	жеше	.
SFX	Y0		жа	жехме	.
SFX	Y0		жа	жехте	.
SFX	Y0		жа	жеха	.
SFX	Y0		жа	жи	.
SFX	Y0		жа	жете	.
SFX	Y0		жа	галъ/L5	.
SFX	Y0		жа	желъ/L2	.
SFX	Y0		са	са	.
SFX	Y0		са	сешъ	.
SFX	Y0		са	се	.
SFX	Y0		са	семъ	.
SFX	Y0		са	сете	.
SFX	Y0		са	сатъ	.
SFX	Y0		са	сохъ	.
SFX	Y0		са	сѣ	.
SFX	Y0		са	сѣ	.
SFX	Y0		са	сохме	.
SFX	Y0		са	сохте	.
SFX	Y0		са	соха	.
SFX	Y0		са	сѣхъ	.
SFX	Y0		са	сѣше	.
SFX	Y0		са	сѣше	.
SFX	Y0		са	сѣхме	.
SFX	Y0		са	сѣхте	.
SFX	Y0		са	сѣха	.
SFX	Y0		са	си	.
SFX	Y0		са	сете	.
SFX	Y0		са	сълъ/L1	.
SFX	Y0		са	сѣлъ/L2	.
SFX	Y0		ка	ка	.
SFX	Y0		ка	чешъ	.
SFX	Y0		ка	че	.
SFX	Y0		ка	чемъ	.
SFX	Y0		ка	чете	.
SFX	Y0		ка	катъ	.
SFX	Y0		ка	кохъ	.
SFX	Y0		ка	че	.
SFX	Y0		ка	че	.
SFX	Y0		ка	кохме	.
SFX	Y0		ка	кохте	.
SFX	Y0		ка	коха	.
SFX	Y0		ка	чахъ	.
SFX	Y0		ка	чеше	.
SFX	Y0		ка	чеше	.
SFX	Y0		ка	чахме	.
SFX	Y0		ка	чахте	.
SFX	Y0		ка	чаха	.
SFX	Y0		ка	чи	.
SFX	Y0		ка	чете	.
SFX	Y0		ка	кълъ/L1	.
SFX	Y0		ка	чалъ/L2	.
SFX	Y0		ча	ча	.
SFX	Y0		ча	чешъ	.
SFX	Y0		ча	че	.
SFX	Y0		ча	чемъ	.
SFX	Y0		ча	чете	.
SFX	Y0		ча	чатъ	.
SFX	Y0		ча	кахъ	.
SFX	Y0		ча	ка	.
SFX	Y0		ча	ка	.
SFX	Y0		ча	кахме	.
SFX	Y0		ча	кахте	.
SFX	Y0		ча	каха	.
SFX	Y0		ча	чехъ	.
SFX	Y0		ча	чеше	.
SFX	Y0		ча	чеше	.
SFX	Y0		ча	чехме	.
SFX	Y0		ча	чехте	.
SFX	Y0		ча	чеха	.
SFX	Y0		ча	чи	.
SFX	Y0		ча	чете	.
SFX	Y0		ча	калъ/L5	.
SFX	Y0		ча	челъ/L2	.
					
SFX	Y1	Y	4		
SFX	Y1		жа	ганъ/L4	.
SFX	Y1		ча	канъ/L4	.
SFX	Y1		ка	ченъ/L4	.
SFX	Y1		са	сенъ/L4	.
					
SFX	Y2	Y	8		
SFX	Y2		жа	жещъ/L3	.
SFX	Y2		жа	жейки	.
SFX	Y2		са	сѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	Y2		са	сѣйки	.
SFX	Y2		ка	чещъ/L3	.
SFX	Y2		ка	чейки	.
SFX	Y2		ча	чещъ/L3	.
SFX	Y2		ча	чейки	.
					
SFX	Y3	Y	22		
SFX	Y3		ка	ка	.
SFX	Y3		ка	чешъ	.
SFX	Y3		ка	че	.
SFX	Y3		ка	чемъ	.
SFX	Y3		ка	чете	.
SFX	Y3		ка	катъ	.
SFX	Y3		ка	кахъ	.
SFX	Y3		ка	ка	.
SFX	Y3		ка	ка	.
SFX	Y3		ка	кахме	.
SFX	Y3		ка	кахте	.
SFX	Y3		ка	каха	.
SFX	Y3		ка	чехъ	.
SFX	Y3		ка	чеше	.
SFX	Y3		ка	чеше	.
SFX	Y3		ка	чехме	.
SFX	Y3		ка	чехте	.
SFX	Y3		ка	чеха	.
SFX	Y3		ка	чи	.
SFX	Y3		ка	чете	.
SFX	Y3		ка	калъ/L5	.
SFX	Y3		ка	челъ/L2	.
					
SFX	Y4	Y	1		
SFX	Y4		ка	канъ/L4	.
					
SFX	Z0	Y	66		
SFX	Z0		а	а	.
SFX	Z0		а	ешъ	.
SFX	Z0		а	е	.
SFX	Z0		а	емъ	.
SFX	Z0		а	ете	.
SFX	Z0		а	атъ	.
SFX	Z0		а	ѣхъ	.
SFX	Z0		а	ѣ	.
SFX	Z0		а	ѣ	.
SFX	Z0		а	ѣхме	.
SFX	Z0		а	ѣхте	.
SFX	Z0		а	ѣха	.
SFX	Z0		а	ѣхъ	.
SFX	Z0		а	ѣше	.
SFX	Z0		а	ѣше	.
SFX	Z0		а	ѣхме	.
SFX	Z0		а	ѣхте	.
SFX	Z0		а	ѣха	.
SFX	Z0		а	и	.
SFX	Z0		а	ете	.
SFX	Z0		а	ѣлъ/L5	.
SFX	Z0		а	ѣлъ/L2	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	мъ	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	дешъ	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	де	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	демъ	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	дете	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	датъ	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	дохъ	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	дѣ	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	дѣ	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	дохме	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	дохте	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	доха	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	дѣхъ	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	дѣше	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	дѣше	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	дѣхме	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	дѣхте	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	дѣха	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	жъ	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	жте	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	лъ/L5	.
SFX	Z0		мъ	дѣлъ/L2	.
SFX	Z0		ая	ая	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аешъ	.
SFX	Z0		ая	ае	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аемъ	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аете	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аятъ	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аяхъ	.
SFX	Z0		ая	ая	.
SFX	Z0		ая	ая	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аяхме	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аяхте	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аяха	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аехъ	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аеше	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аеше	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аехме	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аехте	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аеха	.
SFX	Z0		ая	ай	.
SFX	Z0		ая	айте	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аялъ/L5	.
SFX	Z0		ая	аелъ/L2	.
					
SFX	Z1	Y	23		
SFX	Z1		ма	ма	.
SFX	Z1		ма	мешъ	.
SFX	Z1		ма	ме	.
SFX	Z1		ма	мемъ	.
SFX	Z1		ма	мете	.
SFX	Z1		ма	матъ	.
SFX	Z1		ма	хъ	.
SFX	Z1		ма	0	.
SFX	Z1		ма	0	.
SFX	Z1		ма	хме	.
SFX	Z1		ма	хте	.
SFX	Z1		ма	ха	.
SFX	Z1		ма	мехъ	.
SFX	Z1		ма	меше	.
SFX	Z1		ма	меше	.
SFX	Z1		ма	мехме	.
SFX	Z1		ма	мехте	.
SFX	Z1		ма	мѣха	.
SFX	Z1		ма	ми	.
SFX	Z1		ма	мете	.
SFX	Z1		ма	лъ/L5	.
SFX	Z1		ма	мелъ/L2	.
SFX	Z1		знамъ	знамъ	.
					
SFX	Z2	Y	22		
SFX	Z2		за	за	.
SFX	Z2		за	зешъ	.
SFX	Z2		за	зе	.
SFX	Z2		за	земъ	.
SFX	Z2		за	зете	.
SFX	Z2		за	затъ	.
SFX	Z2		за	зохъ	.
SFX	Z2		за	зе	.
SFX	Z2		за	зе	.
SFX	Z2		за	зохме	.
SFX	Z2		за	зохте	.
SFX	Z2		за	зоха	.
SFX	Z2		за	зехъ	.
SFX	Z2		за	зеше	.
SFX	Z2		за	зеше	.
SFX	Z2		за	зехме	.
SFX	Z2		за	зехте	.
SFX	Z2		за	зеха	.
SFX	Z2		за	зъ	.
SFX	Z2		за	зте	.
SFX	Z2		за	зълъ/L1	.
SFX	Z2		за	зелъ/L2	.
					
SFX	Z3	Y	1		
SFX	Z3		ая	аянъ/L4	.
					
SFX	Z4	Y	10		
SFX	Z4		ая	аенъ	.
SFX	Z4		ая	айния	.
SFX	Z4		ая	айниятъ	.
SFX	Z4		ая	айний	.
SFX	Z4		ая	айна	.
SFX	Z4		ая	айната	.
SFX	Z4		ая	айно	.
SFX	Z4		ая	айното	.
SFX	Z4		ая	айни	.
SFX	Z4		ая	айнитѣ	.
					
SFX	Z5	Y	3		
SFX	Z5		мъ	денъ/L4	.
SFX	Z5		а	ѣнъ/L4	[^м]а
SFX	Z5		ма	тъ/L4	.
					
SFX	Z6	Y	3		
SFX	Z6		а	ѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	Z6		мъ	дѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	Z6		ая	аещъ/L3	.
					
SFX	Z7	Y	4		
SFX	Z7		ая	атъ/L4	.
SFX	Z7		ия	итъ/L4	.
SFX	Z7		уя	утъ/L4	.
SFX	Z7		юя	ютъ/L4	.
